src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 4_ADELISTID_V   !!= * __@CODE@__

+Inf:%>iđ K ;
+PrsPrc:e%>e K ;
+PrfPrc:á%>m K ;
+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:â%>m K ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2^CLEN C_PASS_SH ; !we need a spec 4 contlex
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:á^VHIGH%>m K ;  !
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG^VHIGH%>ččii K ;  !
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG^VHIGH%>á K ;  !
+Imprt+ConNeg:i K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:á^WG%>m K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:á^WG%>h K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:    K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:e%>en K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>vettee K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:e%>v   K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>p K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>vetteđ K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:e%>h K ;

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>im K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>ih K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ij K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>ijm K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>ijd K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>ijn  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>ijm K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>ijd K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>ii K ;

+Cond+Prs+Sg1:%>áččim K ;
+Cond+Prs+Sg2:%>áččih K ;
+Cond+Prs+Sg3:%>áčij K ;
+Cond+Prs+Du1:%>áččáim K ;
+Cond+Prs+Du2:%>áččáid K ;
+Cond+Prs+Du3:%>áččáin K ;
+Cond+Prs+Pl1:%>áččijm K ;
+Cond+Prs+Pl2:%>áččijd K ;
+Cond+Prs+Pl3:%>áččii K ;

+Pot+Prs+Sg1:%>eem K ;
+Pot+Prs+Sg2:%>eeh K ;
+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>iš K ;
+Pot+Prs+Du1:%>ižeen K ;
+Pot+Prs+Du2:%>išvettee K ;
+Pot+Prs+Du3:%>ižává K ;
+Pot+Prs+Pl1:%>ižep K ;
+Pot+Prs+Pl2:%>išvetteđ K ;
+Pot+Prs+Pl3:%>ižeh K ;

+Imprt+Sg1:%>um K ;
+Imprt+Sg2: K ;
+Imprt+Sg3:%>us K ;
+Imprt+Du1:%>oon K ;
+Imprt+Du2:%>ee K ;
+Imprt+Du3:%>us K ;
+Imprt+Pl1:%>op K ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>iđ K ;
+Imprt+Pl3:%>us K ;

+Actio+Nom:%>em NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:%>min K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct: FLAG_3KEPIDEM ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct+Err/Orth:im FLAG_3KEPIDEM ; ! Normed
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e C_TAHHEE ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !suopâlistškuát


LEXICON 4_ITTID  ! for verbs without transitivty marking
+V: 4_ITTID_V ;
LEXICON 4_ITTID_IV ! for verbs with IV marking, when they come
+V+IV: 4_ITTID_V ;
LEXICON 4_ITTID_TV ! for verbs with TV marking, when they come
+V+TV: 4_ITTID_V ;

LEXICON 4_ITTID_V   !!= * __@CODE@__ temporarilly, we need a yaml for this
+Inf:%>iđ K ;
+Inf+Err/Orth:%>eđ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  K ; ! 
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>âm  K ; ! 
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG%>ččii  K ; ! 

+PrsPrc:e%>e K ;
+PrfPrc:á%>m K ;
+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:â%>m K ;

+Actio+Ill:^CSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:^CSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:^CSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:^CSH%>min K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:em FLAG_3LITTER ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct+Err/Orth:im FLAG_3LITTER ; ! Normed
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e C_TAHHEE ;

+Ind+Prs: 4_ITTID_V_PRS ;
+Ind+Prt: 4_ITTID_V_PRT ;
+Cond+Prs: 4_ITTID_V_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: 4_ITTID_V_POT ;
+Imprt: 4_ITTID_V_IMPRT ;

LEXICON 4_ITTID_V_PRS
+Sg1:á^CSH%>m K ;	
+Sg2:á^CSH%>h K ;	! almostitáh
+Sg3:^CSH%> K ;		! almostit 
+Du1:e%>en K ;		! almostitteen
+Du2:^CSH%>vettee K ;	! almostitvettee  
+Du3:e%>v K ;		! almostittev
+Pl1:e%>p K ;		! almostittep
+Pl2:^CSH%>vetteđ K ;	! almostitvetteđ  
+Pl3:e^CSH%>h K ;	! almostiteh 
+Pl3+Err/Orth:e%>h K ;	! olásutteh 
+Pl3+Err/Orth:e%>h K ;	! almostitteh (common error)

LEXICON 4_ITTID_V_PRT 
+Sg1:i%>m K ;
+Sg2:i%>h K ;
+Sg3:i^CSH%>j K ; ! 
+Du1:i^CSH%>jm K ;
+Du2:i^CSH%>jd K ;
+Du3:i^CSH%>jn K ;
+Pl1:i^CSH%>jm K ;
+Pl2:i^CSH%>jd K ;
+Pl3:i%>i3 K ;

LEXICON 4_ITTID_V_COND 
+Sg1:á^CSH%>ččim K ; 
+Sg2:á^CSH%>ččih K ;
+Sg3:^CSH%>áččij K ;
+Du1:^CSH%>áččáim K ;
+Du2:^CSH%>áččáid K ;
+Du3:^CSH%>áččáin K ;
+Pl1:^CSH%>áččijm K ;
+Pl2:^CSH%>áččijd K ;
+Pl3:á^CSH%>ččii K ;

LEXICON 4_ITTID_V_POT 
+Sg1:%>eem K ;
+Sg2:%>eeh K ;
+Sg3:i^CSH%>š K ;
+Du1:i^CSH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:i^CSH%>švettee K ;
+Du3:i^CSH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:i^CSH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:i^CSH%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:i^CSH%>žeh K ;

LEXICON 4_ITTID_V_IMPRT 
+Sg1:%>um K ;
+Sg2: K ;
+Sg3:%>us K ;
+Du1:%>oon K ;
+Du2:%>ee K ;
+Du3:%>us K ;
+Pl1:%>op K ;
+Pl2:%>iđ K ;
+Pl3:%>us K ;



LEXICON 4_UHCAD
+V+TV: 4_UHCAD_V ;
LEXICON 4_UHCAD_TV
+V+TV: 4_UHCAD_V ;

LEXICON 4_UHCAD_V
!:u^RVhč 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
+Inf:%>uhčâđ K ;
+Inf+Use/NG:%>âhčâđ K ;
+PrsPrc:%>uhčee K ;
+PrfPrc:%>uhčâm K ;
+Der3+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc:%>uhčum K ; ! pusaluhčum (more forms?)
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>uhčâm K ;  !
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:uvčá%>ččii K ;  !
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:uvžá%>á K ;  !
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>uš K ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>uuvčâm K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>uuvčah K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:uš K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:âš K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>uhčeen K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>ušvettee K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>uhčâv K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>uhčâp K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ušvetteđ K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>uhčeh K ;

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>uhčim K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>uhčih K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>uuvčâi K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>uvččáim K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>uvččáid K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>uvččáin K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>uuvčâim K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>uuvčâid K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>uhčii K ;


+Inf+Err/Orth:%>âhčâđ K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>âš        K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth:%>âhčeen    K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du2+Err/Orth:%>âšvettee  K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du3+Err/Orth:%>âhčâv     K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>âhčâp     K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Err/Orth:%>âšvetteđ  K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>âhčeh     K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Err/Orth:%>âhčim     K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth:%>âhčih 	 K ;


+Cond+Prs+Sg1:%>uvčâččim K ;
+Cond+Prs+Sg2:%>uvčâččih K ;
+Cond+Prs+Sg3:%>uvčâččij K ;
+Cond+Prs+Du1:%>uvčâččáim K ;
+Cond+Prs+Du2:%>uvčâččáid K ;
+Cond+Prs+Du3:%>uvčâččáin K ;
+Cond+Prs+Pl1:%>uvčâččijm K ;
+Cond+Prs+Pl2:%>uvčâččijd K ;
+Cond+Prs+Pl3:%>uvčâččii K ;

+Imprt+Sg2:uš K ;
+Imprt+Sg3:uš K ;

+VGen:ušâ^WG%>n VGEN ; 
+VAbess:uš%>hánnáá K ;
+Ger:uš^CSH%>tijn K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:uš^CSH%>tijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:uš^CSH%>tijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:uš^CSH%>tijnis K ;
+Actio+Nom:uššâ%>m NOMACT ; 
+Actio+Ill:uš%>mân K ; 
+Actio+Loc:uš%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:uš%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:uš%>min K ; 
+Der4+Der/NomAct:uš FLAG_3KIEDAVUSSAM ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:uš^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:uhču2^CLEN C_PASS_SH ; 
+Der2+Der/NomAg:uš%>e C_TAHHEE ;



!pres
!s valastâlâm valastâlah valastâl 
!d valastâlleen/valastelleen valastâlvettee valastâllav 
!p valastâllâp valastâlvetteđ valastâleh/valasteleh
!pret
!s valastâllim/valastellim valastâllih/valastellih valastâlâi 
!d X X X
!p X X valastâllii/valastellii******
!
!s posâdâđâm X X
!d posâdâtteen/posâdetteen X X
!p X X posâlâddeh/posâleddeh
!
!s adelâttâđ
!d adelâtteen/adeletteen  
!---------  
!hámiin prs d1 (een), p3 (eh)
!       prt s1 (im), s2 (ih), p3 (ii)
!galgá leat sihke e ja â 3. stávvalis
!--------

LEXICON 4_DATTAD_IV
+V+IV:  4_DATTADD_V ;

LEXICON 4_DATTAD_TV
+V+TV:  4_DATTADD_V ;

LEXICON 4_DATTAD
+V:  4_DATTADD_V ;


LEXICON 4_DATTADD_V
:dâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD_V ;
+Err/Orth:đâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD_V ;



LEXICON 4_KAVNATTATTAD
+V: 4_KAVNATTATTAD_V ;
LEXICON 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV
+V+IV: 4_KAVNATTATTAD_V ;
LEXICON 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV
+V+TV: 4_KAVNATTATTAD_V ;
