src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
adaluhčâđ:adal 4_UHCAD_TV ;
ahevuššâđ:ahevušš 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
adelâddâđ:adelâdd 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV "antautua" ; ! ¢alanâd
aldadâllâđ:aldadâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ; ! aˊldadâll
almostittiđ:almostitt 4_ITTID_TV ;
anadâttâđ:ana 4_DATTAD_IV ; ! ¢anadâđâm
anattâttâđ:anattâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
asâiduttiđ:asâidutt 4_ITTID_TV ;
avâštâllâđ:avâštâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
aštiidâttâđ:aštii 4_DATTAD_IV ;
ceggiistâllâđ:ceggiistâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
ciláidittiđ:cilái4ditt 4_ITTID_IV ;
ciähudâttâđ:ciähu 4_DATTAD_IV ; ! ciäˊhudâtt
cogâdâttâđ:cogâ 4_DATTAD_IV ;
cojâdâttâđ:cojâ 4_DATTAD_TV ; ! IV?
falâdâttâđ:falâ 4_DATTAD_TV ;
falâluhčâđ:falâl 4_UHCAD ;
falâluššâđ:falâlušš 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
falâlâhčâđ:falâl 4_UHCAD ;
fierriittâllâđ:fierriittâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! fierˊriittâll
hastâluhčâđ:hastâl 4_UHCAD ;
hilgottâttâđ:hilgottâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! hiˊlgottâtt
hiäpášittiđ:hiäpášitt 4_ITTID ;
hiärástâllâđ:hiärástâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
hurgáttâllâđ:hurgáttâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
huáppulittiđ:huáppulitt 4_ITTID ;
hárččulâhčâđ:hárččul 4_UHCAD ;
cummâlâhčâđ:cummâl 4_UHCAD ;
luhâlâhčâđ:luhâl 4_UHCAD ;
pačâlâhčâđ:pačâl 4_UHCAD ;
posolâhčâđ:posol 4_UHCAD ;
posâlâhčâđ:posâl 4_UHCAD ;
tiäddálâhčâđ:tiäddál 4_UHCAD ;
vázzálâhčâđ:vázzál 4_UHCAD ;
hávdádâllâđ:hávdádâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ;
irgášuhčâđ:irgáš 4_UHCAD ; ! iˊrgášuhč
iänáduttiđ:iänádutt 4_ITTID ;
iätáduddâđ:iätádudd 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ; ! iäˊtádudd
jiänáttâllâđ:jiänáttâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! jiäˊnáttâll
jolâstuttiđ:jolâstutt 4_ITTID ;
kamâdâttâđ:kamâ 4_DATTAD_TV ;
kavnâdâttâđ:kavnâ 4_DATTAD ;
kaččâlittiđ:kaččâlitt 4_ITTID ;
kerivuššâđ:kerivušš 4_KAVNATTATTAD ;
keččâlâddâđ:keččâlâdd 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
kijvástâllâđ:kijvástâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ; ! kiˊjvástâll
kiäsádittiđ:kiäsáditt 4_ITTID ;
kiäsádâttâđ:kiäsá 4_DATTAD_IV ; ! kiäˊsádâtt
kiškodâttâđ:kiško 4_DATTAD_IV ; ! kiˊškodâtt
kohádâttâđ:kohá 4_DATTAD ;
kolliistâllâđ:kolliistâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
korppâsâddâđ:korppâsâdd 4_KAVNATTATTAD ;
kumâttâllâđ:kumâttâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
kuođâldittiđ:kuođâlditt 4_ITTID "vakoilla" ;
kuškâdâttâđ:kuškâ 4_DATTAD ; ! kuˊškâdâtt
kákárâttâđ:kákárâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD ;
kárvudâttâđ:kárvu 4_DATTAD_TV ;
käpilittiđ:käpilitt 4_ITTID ;
lavliistâllâđ:lavliistâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
leirâdâttâđ:lei4râ 4_DATTAD ; ! leˊirâdâtt
luhâluhčâđ:luhâl 4_UHCAD ;
luoddiistâllâđ:luoddiistâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! luodˊdiistâll
láittádâttâđ:láittá 4_DATTAD ;
muálkkiluttiđ:muálkkilutt 4_ITTID ;
muátástâllâđ:muátástâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! muáˊtástâll
máttááttâllâđ:máttááttâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
nabdastâllâđ:nabdastâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ; ! naˊbdastâll
njuáludâttâđ:njuálu 4_DATTAD ; ! njuáˊludâtt
njálgástâllâđ:njálgástâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ;
nurvodâttâđ:nurvo 4_DATTAD ; ! nuˊrvodâtt
olášuttiđ:olášutt 4_ITTID ;
ornijdâttâđ:ornij 4_DATTAD_IV ; !from bidix
ovtâstâttâđ:ovtâstâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! oˊvtâstâtt
oŋâttâššâđ:oŋâttâšš 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
patârâddâđ:patârâdd 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
pačâluhčâđ:pačâl 4_UHCAD ;
pivâstuddâđ:pivâstudd 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
piälháttâllâđ:piälháttâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! piäˊlháttâll
pokkiidâttâđ:pokkii 4_DATTAD ;
porgottâllâđ:porgottâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
posoluhčâđ:posol 4_UHCAD ;
posâdâttâđ:posâ 4_DATTAD_IV ;
posâluhčâđ:posâl 4_UHCAD_TV ;
pozáttâllâđ:pozáttâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
pullárittiđ:pulláritt 4_ITTID ;
punjâdâttâđ:punjâ 4_DATTAD_IV ;
pyeredâttâđ:pyere 4_DATTAD ; ! pyeˊredâtt
rahttâttâđ:rahttâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
ramâččâttâđ:ramâččâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD ;
ronedâttâđ:rone 4_DATTAD ;
ruokâsmittiđ:ruokâsmitt 4_ITTID_TV ;
ruovâdâttâđ:ruovâ 4_DATTAD ; ! ruoˊvâdâtt
ruáinudâttâđ:ruái4nu 4_DATTAD_TV ; ! ruáiˊnudâtt
ruákášâttâđ:ruákášâtt4 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ; ! ruáˊkášâtt
rávhuttuttiđ:rávhuttutt 4_ITTID ;
skilottuddâđ:skilottudd 4_KAVNATTATTAD ;
skilottuttiđ:skilottutt 4_ITTID ;
skippuudâttâđ:skippuu 4_DATTAD ;
sovâdâttâđ:sovâ 4_DATTAD_IV ;
spiddáádâttâđ:spiddáá 4_DATTAD_IV ;
suorgâttâllâđ:suorgâttâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ; ! suoˊrgâttâll
suotâstittiđ:suotâstitt 4_ITTID ;
surâdâttâđ:surâ 4_DATTAD ;
tigáštâllâđ:tigáštâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
tiäddáluhčâđ:tiäddál 4_UHCAD ; ! tiädˊdálâhč
mulsâšuddâđ:mulsâšudd 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
tovâdâttâđ:tovâ 4_DATTAD ;
turedâttâđ:ture 4_DATTAD_TV ;
tuálvástittiđ:tuálvástitt 4_ITTID ;
tuávidâššâđ:tuávidâšš 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! tuáˊvidâšš
uhkáástâllâđ:uhkáástâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ;
uigâdâttâđ:ui4gâ 4_DATTAD_TV ; ! uˊigâdâtt !¢uigâdâđâm
fattiidâttâđ:fattii 4_DATTAD ;
vijsástâllâđ:vijsástâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ; ! viˊjsástâll
viäisádittiđ:viäisáditt 4_ITTID ;
viärdádâllâđ:viärdádâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ; ! viärˊdádâll
viärmádâttâđ:viärmá 4_DATTAD ;
vájáldittiđ:vájálditt 4_ITTID_TV ;
vájálduttiđ:vájáldutt 4_ITTID_TV ; !corpus
váldásmittiđ:váldásmitt 4_ITTID_TV ;
várdáástâllâđ:várdáástâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ;
vázzáluhčâđ:vázzál 4_UHCAD ;
áštáluhčâđ:áštál 4_UHCAD_TV ;
čergijdittiđ:čergijditt 4_ITTID ;
čierâstâllâđ:čierâstâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_TV ; ! čieˊrâstâll
čiähádâttâđ:čiähá 4_DATTAD_IV ; ! čiäˊhádâtt
čiŋâdâttâđ:čiŋâ 4_DATTAD_IV ;
čonâdâttâđ:čonâ 4_DATTAD_IV ;	!usual rection: ill
čulgâdâttâđ:čulgâ 4_DATTAD_TV ; ! čuˊlgâdâtt
čulgâluhčâđ:čulgâl 4_UHCAD ;
čuolâdâttâđ:čuolâ 4_DATTAD ; ! čuoˊlâdâtt
čurmâdâttâđ:čurmâ 4_DATTAD_TV ; ! čuˊrmâdâtt
čáládâttâđ:čálá 4_DATTAD ;
šiettuustâllâđ:šiettuustâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; ! šietˊtuustâll
škuráidittiđ:škurái4ditt 4_ITTID ;
tulâstâllâđ:tulâstâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
čalmaastâllâđ:čalmaastâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
purgâstâllâđ:purgâstâll 4_KAVNATTATTAD_IV ;
